Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.900

Inclusion of findings of fact.

Both the board of adjustment and the zoning adjustor shall, in making an order, requirement, decision or determination, include in a written record of the case the findings of fact upon which the action is based.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.900. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 90.]